Utah statutes.
48-2c-1702.   Proper plaintiff.

In an action under Section 48-2c-1701, the plaintiff must be a member at the time of bringing the action and:

(1)  must have been a member at the time of the transaction of which the member complains; or

(2)  the member's status as a member must have devolved upon him by transfer or by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the operating agreement from a person who was a member at the time of the transaction.

